Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1206SS (3) 91 je/jh S.F. 127 Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may be 1 cited as the âSchool of Intellectual Freedom Actâ. 2 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 263C.1 Definitions. 3 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 4 requires: 5 1. âBoardâ means the state board of regents. 6 2. âSchoolâ means the school of intellectual freedom 7 established by section 263C.2. 8 3. âUniversityâ means the state university of Iowa. 9 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 263C.2 School of intellectual freedom. 10 1. A school of intellectual freedom is established as an 11 independent academic unit within the university. The school 12 shall be physically located in the college of liberal arts and 13 sciences. 14 2. The school shall conduct teaching and research in the 15 historical ideas, traditions, and texts that have shaped the 16 American constitutional order and society. 17 3. The board may name the school in accordance with any 18 philanthropic naming policies or practices of the board or 19 university. 20 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 263C.3 Functions of the school. 21 1. The school shall offer instruction in all of the 22 following subjects: 23 a. The texts and major debates that form the intellectual 24 foundation of free societies, especially that of the United 25 States. 26 b. The principles, ideals, and institutions of the American 27 constitutional order. 28 c. The foundations of responsible leadership and informed 29 citizenship. 30 2. The school shall offer university-wide programming 31 related to the values of free speech and civil discourse. 32 3. The school shall work to do all of the following: 33 a. Expand the intellectual diversity of the universityâs 34 academic community. 35 -1- LSB 1206SS (3) 91 je/jh 1/ 5 S.F. 127 b. Foster civic engagement among university students and 1 faculty. 2 4. The school may offer courses; develop certificate, 3 minor, and major programs as well as graduate programs; and 4 offer degrees. 5 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 263C.4 Bylaws. 6 The school shall establish bylaws governing the school 7 subject to the approval of the dean of the school. In addition 8 to any other bylaws established, the bylaws shall include all 9 of the following requirements, which shall take precedence over 10 any other requirements in the bylaws: 11 1. The school shall educate students by means of free, open, 12 and rigorous intellectual inquiry to seek the truth. 13 2. The school affirms its duty to equip students with 14 the skills, habits, and dispositions of mind they need to 15 reach their own informed conclusions on matters of social and 16 political importance. 17 3. The school affirms the value of intellectual diversity 18 in higher education and aspires to enhance the intellectual 19 diversity of the university. 20 4. The school affirms a commitment to create a community 21 dedicated to an ethic of civil and free inquiry, which respects 22 the intellectual freedom of each member, supports individual 23 capacities for growth, and welcomes the differences of opinion 24 that naturally exist in a public university community. 25 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 263C.5 Funding ââ use. 26 1. The school may accept and administer private and external 27 donations and gifts. 28 2. Any moneys appropriated to the school, and any private 29 and external donations to the school, shall be used only for 30 the direct operation of the school and shall not be used for 31 any indirect costs of the university. 32 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 263C.6 School faculty. 33 The university shall employ at least five tenure-eligible 34 faculty members to provide instruction through the school. 35 -2- LSB 1206SS (3) 91 je/jh 2/ 5 S.F. 127 Faculty members appointed to the school may hold joint 1 appointments to other academic units of the university. 2 Faculty members who are not appointed to the school shall 3 have no authority to approve, deny, or modify the terms of 4 appointment of faculty to the school. 5 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 263C.7 Academic council. 6 1. No later than December 31, 2025, the board shall appoint 7 an academic council for the purpose of assisting in the 8 selection of a dean of the school pursuant to section 263C.8. 9 2. The board may appoint up to nine members to the council. 10 No more than one member of the council may be an employee of the 11 university. A majority of the members appointed to the council 12 shall constitute a quorum. 13 3. The board shall determine the initial length of each 14 memberâs term in accordance with this subsection. A majority 15 of the members initially appointed to the council shall serve 16 initial terms of four years. The remaining initially appointed 17 members shall serve initial terms of two years. The board 18 shall appoint new members to fill vacancies on the council in 19 accordance with this section. 20 Sec. 9. NEW SECTION . 263C.8 Appointment of dean. 21 1. The academic council established under section 263C.7 22 shall conduct a nationwide search for candidates for the dean 23 of the school. The council shall strictly adhere to all 24 relevant state and federal laws in conducting the search. The 25 council shall submit a list of finalists for the position to 26 the board, which shall select and appoint the dean from the 27 list. Subsequent deans shall be chosen in the same manner. 28 2. The dean shall be eligible for tenure. 29 Sec. 10. NEW SECTION . 263C.9 Duties of dean. 30 1. The dean of the school shall have the sole and exclusive 31 authority to manage the recruitment and hiring process and to 32 extend offers for employment for all faculty and staff of the 33 school and to terminate employment of all staff of the school. 34 2. The dean shall oversee, develop, and approve the 35 -3- LSB 1206SS (3) 91 je/jh 3/ 5 S.F. 127 curriculum, courses, and programs of the school. 1 3. The dean shall have the sole and exclusive authority 2 to invite guest speakers to the university on behalf of the 3 school. 4 4. The dean shall consult with the dean of the college of 5 liberal arts and sciences when carrying out the deanâs duties. 6 However, the dean shall report directly to the president of the 7 university or a designee of the president. 8 Sec. 11. NEW SECTION . 263C.10 Annual report. 9 The dean of the school shall submit an annual report to the 10 governor, the general assembly, and the board of regents by 11 December 31. The report shall provide a full account of the 12 schoolâs achievements and shall identify any opportunities, 13 challenges, and obstacles in the development of the school. 14